South Dakota, session 2026, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 25-4A-8 be AMENDED:
25-4A-8. The provisions of § 23A-38-2 do not apply to §§ 25-4A-1 to 25-4A-5,
inclusive.
Section 2. That § 25-4A-6 be REPEALED.
Section 3. That § 25-4A-7 be REPEALED.

26.288.10 2 1012
An Act to revise and repeal provisions allowing probation for contempt of a custody or
visitation decree.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1012
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1012 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1012 ENROLLED